Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2305
Public Employees Retirement Board; duties; rules and regulations.

It shall be the duty of the board to administer the County Employees Retirement Act as provided in section 84-1503. The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the act.

Laws 1965, c. 94, § 5, p. 404;

Laws 1969, c. 172, § 2, p. 752;

Laws 1979, LB 416, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 347, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 369, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB1005, § 2.